Utah statutes.
70A-1a-205.   Reasonable time -- Seasonableness.

(1)  Whether a time for taking an action required by this title is reasonable depends on the nature, purpose, and circumstances of the action.

(2)  An action is taken seasonably if it is taken at or within the time agreed or, if no time is agreed, at or within a reasonable time.

